Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 6 Interstate Cooperation

Cross references.

Military relations with other states, §

38-2-90

et seq.

28-6-1.
Creation of Senate, House, and Governor’s committees; membership.

There is established a standing committee of the Senate of this state to be known officially as the Senate Committee on Interstate Cooperation and to consist of five Senators. The members and the chairman of this committee shall be designated in the same manner as is customary in the case of the members and chairmen of other standing committees of the Senate. In addition to the regular members, the President of the Senate shall be ex officio an honorary nonvoting member of this committee.

There is established a standing committee of the House of Representatives of this state to be known officially as the House Committee on Interstate Cooperation and to consist of five members of the House of Representatives. The members and the chairman of this committee shall be designated in the same manner as is customary in the case of the members and chairmen of other standing committees of the House of Representatives. In addition to the regular members, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be ex officio an honorary nonvoting member of this committee.

There is established a committee of administrative officials and employees of this state to be known officially as the Governor’s Committee on Interstate Cooperation and to consist of five members. Its members shall be: the Commissioner of Insurance, ex officio; the Secretary of State, ex officio; and three other administrative officials or employees to be designated by the Governor none of whom shall be the Attorney General. The Governor shall appoint one of the five members of this committee as its chairman. In addition to the regular members, the Governor shall be ex officio an honorary nonvoting member of this committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 708, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 11; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1.

28-6-1.1.
“Nonpartisan legislative organization” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “nonpartisan legislative organization” means an organization whose membership is limited to legislators and which does not align itself with and is not funded by a political party.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-6-1.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 689, § 2/HB 1067.

28-6-2.
Creation of Georgia Commission on Interstate Cooperation; membership.

There is established the Georgia Commission on Interstate Cooperation. The commission shall be composed of 15 regular members:

The five members of the Senate Committee on Interstate Cooperation;

The five members of the House Committee on Interstate Cooperation; and

The five members of the Governor’s Committee on Interstate Cooperation.

The chairperson of the Senate Committee on Interstate Cooperation and the chairperson of the House Committee on Interstate Cooperation shall be cochairpersons of the commission.

The Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be ex officio honorary nonvoting members of this commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 708, § 4; Ga. L. 2006, p. 689, § 1/HB 1067.

28-6-3.
Functions of commission.

It shall be the function of the commission to:

Carry forward the participation of this state as a member of any regional, national, or international nonpartisan legislative organization that promotes interstate or international cooperation;

Encourage and assist the legislative, executive, administrative, and judicial officials and employees of this state to develop and maintain friendly contact by correspondence, by conference, and otherwise with officials and employees of the other states, of the federal government, and of local units of government;

Endeavor to advance cooperation between this state and other units of government whenever it seems advisable to do so by formulating proposals for and by facilitating:

The adoption of compacts;

The enactment of uniform or reciprocal statutes;

The adoption of uniform or reciprocal administrative rules and regulations;

The informal cooperation of governmental offices with one another;

The personal cooperation of governmental officials and employees with one another;

The interchange and clearance of research and information; and

Any other suitable process; and

Do all such acts as will, in the opinion of the commission, enable this state to do its part or more in forming a more perfect union among the various governments in the United States and in promoting international relations by developing nonpartisan legislative organizations for such purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 708, § 6; Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 689, § 3/HB 1067.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘State and Local Taxation, Financing, and Service Delivery Revision Act of 2004’.”

Law reviews.

For article on 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 226 (2004).

28-6-4.
Establishment of delegations, committees, and advisory boards by commission.

The commission shall establish such delegations and committees as it deems advisable in order that they may confer and formulate proposals concerning effective means to secure intergovernmental harmony and may perform other functions for the commission pursuant to its decisions. Subject to the approval of the commission, the member or members of each delegation or committee shall be appointed by the chairman of the commission. State officials or employees who are not members of the Commission on Interstate Cooperation may be appointed as members of any delegation or committee, but private citizens holding no governmental position in this state shall not be eligible. The commission may provide such other rules as it considers appropriate concerning the membership and the functioning of any delegation or committee.

The commission may provide for advisory boards for itself and for its various delegations and committees and may authorize private citizens to serve on such boards.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 708, § 7.

28-6-5.
Reports by commission; compensation of members of commission, delegations, and committees.

The commission shall report to the Governor and to the General Assembly within 15 days after the convening of each regular legislative session and at such other times as it deems appropriate. Its members and the members of all delegations and committees which it establishes shall serve without compensation for such service.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 708, § 8.

28-6-6.
Informal names of committees and commission.

The committees and the commission established by this chapter shall be informally known, respectively, as the Senate Cooperation Committee, the House Cooperation Committee, the Governor’s Cooperation Committee, and the Georgia Cooperation Commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 708, § 9.

28-6-7.
Certain nonpartisan legislative organizations declared joint governmental agencies of the state.

Any nonpartisan legislative organization in which this state is a participant pursuant to paragraph (1) of Code Section 28-6-3 and which has its regional or national headquarters located in this state is declared to be a joint governmental agency of this state and of the other states which cooperate through it.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 708, § 10; Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 28/HB 95; Ga. L. 2006, p. 689, § 4/HB 1067.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘State and Local Taxation, Financing, and Service Delivery Revision Act of 2004’.”

28-6-8.
Appointment of delegates to Article V conventions called by the Congress of the United States for proposing amendments to the Constitution of the United States.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Article V application” means a resolution adopted by the General Assembly on the same subject or containing the same proposed amendment text as not less than two-thirds of the several states of the United States applying to the Congress of the United States for said Congress to call an Article V convention by setting the time and place of such convention.

“Article V convention” means a convention called by the Congress of the United States upon application of the legislatures of not less than two-thirds of the several states of the United States for the purpose of proposing amendments to the Constitution of the United States as expressly provided in Article V of said Constitution.

“Delegate” means a person appointed as provided in this Code section to represent the State of Georgia at an Article V convention.

“Delegation” means the entire group of delegates serving as such, collectively, pursuant to this Code section.

“Legislative instructions” means any instructions given by resolution of the General Assembly to delegates before or during an Article V convention.

“Unauthorized amendment” means a proposed amendment to the Constitution of the United States that is outside the subject matter of the Article V application, the call of the Article V convention by the Congress of the United States, or any legislative instructions.

Upon a call by the Congress of the United States for an Article V convention at which each state of the United States is to have one equal vote, seven delegates shall be appointed forthwith to represent the State of Georgia at such particular Article V convention as follows:

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two delegates;

The President of the Senate shall appoint two delegates;

The Governor shall appoint two delegates; and

One delegate shall be appointed upon the affirmative vote of not less than four of those six delegates who were appointed pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection.

Any vacancy in the delegation due to death, resignation, ineligibility, recall, or other reason shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

No delegate shall have the authority to vote to allow consideration of or vote to approve an unauthorized proposed amendment to the Constitution of the United States.

Any delegate casting a vote to allow consideration or approval of an unauthorized proposed amendment may be immediately recalled by a majority vote of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and the Governor; the position of such recalled delegate shall thereby be vacated; and such unauthorized vote shall be nullified.

Each delegate shall be subject to the eligibility requirements of Code Section 45-2-1 and, upon qualification, shall be required to take the following oath:

“I do solemnly swear or affirm that to the best of my abilities, I will, as a delegate to an Article V convention, uphold the Constitution and laws of the United States and the State of Georgia. I will not vote to allow consideration of or to approve any unauthorized proposed amendment to the United States Constitution.”

Violation of the oath or affirmation provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 16-10-1.

The Secretary of State shall certify in writing to the Article V convention the appointment of delegates, the recall of any delegate, the filling of any vacancy in the delegation, and the nullification of any unauthorized votes cast by any delegate.

No delegate shall be appointed pursuant to this Code section to an Article V convention unless each state of the United States has one equal vote at such convention.

Except upon the resignation, death, ineligibility, recall, or other vacation of office by a delegate, the term of each delegate shall be for the duration of the particular Article V convention for which purpose the delegate was appointed, and the delegation shall be dissolved and disbanded upon the adjournment sine die of such convention.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-6-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 815, § 1/SB 206.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, the enactment of Article 2 of Chapter 1 of Title 50 by Ga. L. 2014, p. 237, § 1/HB 930, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2014, p. 815, § 1/SB 206, due to irreconcilable conflict.

In 2014, the Georgia General Assembly passed HB 794 and SB 206, both relating to Article V Conventions. HB 794, codified at §

50-38-1

, was signed by the Governor on April 12, 2014 (Act No. 475, Ga. L. 2014, p. 20/HB 794). SB 206, codified at §

28-6-8

, was signed by the Governor on April 29, 2014 (Act. No. 641, Ga. L. 2014, p. 815, § 1/SB 206). The Code Revision Commission on May 15, 2014, directed that both Acts be published, although the effect of codifying both is unclear.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 815, § 2/SB 206, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“This Act shall become effective upon the date of the adoption by the General Assembly during the 2013-2014 biennium of a resolution applying to the Congress of the United States to call for a convention for the purpose of proposing one or more amendments to the Constitution of the United States as expressly provided in Article V of said Constitution.
If such a resolution is not adopted by the General Assembly during the 2013-2014 biennium, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on January 1, 2015.” SR 763 was adopted by the General Assembly on March 6, 2014. See Op. Atty Gen. No. 76-76 for construction of effective date provisions that precede the date of approval by the Governor.